Hawaii statutes.
[§165-5] Frivolous lawsuits.
Any nuisance action, found to be frivolous by the court, in which a farming
operation is alleged to be a nuisance as defined in section 165-2, shall be
governed by section 607-14.5. [L 1993, c 162, pt of §1]

Cross References

Vexatious litigants, see chapter 634J.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next